Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 7. Construction Contracts with Public Entities

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

17A C.J.S Contracts § 222.

§ 16-6-701.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Acceptable depository” means a state or national bank or a savings and loan association or credit union in which deposits are insured;

“Contractor” means any person who is a party to a contract with a public entity for a public work;

“Public entity” means as defined in W.S. 16-6-101(a)(viii);

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 31, § 2.

“Alternate design and construction delivery method” means the delivery method described by any qualifications based procurement of design and construction services, including all procedures, actions, events, contractual relationships, obligations and forms of agreement for the successful completion of any public work, other than by design, bid and build. Alternate design and construction delivery methods available to a public entity include construction manager agent, construction manager at risk or design-builder;

“Construction manager agent” means a type of construction management delivery where the professional service is procured under existing statutes for professional services. The construction manager agent is a construction consultant providing administrative and management services to the public entity throughout the design and construction phases of a public work. Under this delivery method, the construction manager agent is not the contracting agent and is not responsible for purchase orders;

“Construction manager at-risk” means a type of construction management delivery in which the construction manager at-risk is an advocate for the public entity as determined by the contracts throughout the preconstruction phase of a project. In the construction phase of a public work, the construction manager at-risk is responsible for all project subcontracts and purchase orders and may conduct all or a portion of the public work. Under this delivery method, the construction manager at-risk is responsible for providing a guaranteed maximum price for the public work to the public entity prior to commencing the public work and the construction manager at-risk shall be required to bond any project in accordance with W.S.

16-6-112

;

“This act” means W.S.

16-6-701

through

16-6-708

;

“Design-build” means a type of construction delivery method in which there is a single contract between the public entity and a design-builder who furnishes architectural, engineering and other related design services as required for the public work, as well as labor, materials and other construction services necessary for the public work. A design-builder may be selected by the public entity based on evaluation of responses to a request for qualifications, fixed scope request for proposal or fixed price request for proposal. The following shall apply:

A design-builder may be selected based solely on a response to a request for qualification for public works with an estimated construction cost of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) or less provided there are not less than two (2) respondents;

Responses to a fixed scope request for proposal or a fixed price request for proposal shall be used as the bases for selection for a public work with an estimated construction cost of more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00);

Interested parties shall first respond to a request for qualification. Based on responses to the request for qualification a minimum of two (2) and maximum of five (5) respondents may be selected to respond to a fixed scope request for proposal or a fixed price request for proposal;

The respondent chosen by evaluation to provide the best overall value for the public work shall be selected in response to a fixed scope request for proposal or a fixed price request for proposal. The best overall value shall be determined based on criteria set forth by the public entity letting the public work and may include, but is not limited to, qualifications, price, quality of materials and products, past experience and schedule;

All unsuccessful respondents to a response for a fixed scope request for proposal or fixed price request for proposal may be compensated at the discretion of the public entity based upon a percentage of the price of the public work as proposed by the successful respondent in the respondent’s original proposal. Any compensation provided pursuant to this subparagraph shall be clearly specified in the request for proposal.

“Design-builder” means an entity that provides design-build services as described under paragraph (ix) of this subsection whether by itself or through subcontractual arrangements with other entities;

“Fixed price request for proposal” means a request for an oral and written presentation of all qualifications deemed pertinent to the public work by the public entity in addition to a schematic design and detailed description of all materials and products proposed to accommodate a preliminary project program prepared by the public entity and provided in the fixed price request for proposal. The successful respondent shall construct the public work described in their design and material and product description for a fixed price prepared by the public entity and provided in the fixed price request for proposal. The final guaranteed maximum price and scope for the public work may be altered from the request for proposal and negotiated with the successful respondent at the discretion of the public entity;

“Fixed scope request for proposal” means a request for an oral and written presentation of all qualifications deemed pertinent to the public work by the public entity in addition to a guaranteed maximum price for a preliminary design prepared by the design builder incorporating all elements of a fixed scope for the public work prepared by the public entity and provided in the fixed scope request for proposal. The final guaranteed maximum price and scope for the public work may be altered from the request for proposal and negotiated with the successful respondent at the discretion of the public entity;

“Request for qualification” means a request for an oral or written presentation of all qualifications deemed pertinent to the public work by the public entity. The request for qualification shall include not less than all the provisions contained in W.S. 16-6-707(b);

“Public work” means as described in W.S. 16-6-101(a)(ix).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 158, § 1; 2006, ch. 98, § 2; 2007, ch. 128, § 1; 2012, ch. 106, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 31, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), inserted (v) through (vii) and redesignated the remaining subsection accordingly; and substituted “16-6-708” for “16-6-706” in (viii).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(v), inserted “or design-builder” at the end of paragraph; added (a)(ix) through (a)(xiii); and made a related change.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) for “one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00)” in (a)(vii).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014,
substituted “renovate or perform major maintenance of” for “erect, alter, install or repair” in (a)(ii) and “major maintenance or renovation” for “alteration or repair” in (a)(v).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(ii) substituted “for a public work” for “to construct, renovate or perform major maintenance of any highway, public building, public work or public improvement, structure or system”; in (a)(iii) substituted “as defined in W.S. 16-6-101(a)(viii)” for “this state or a county, city, town or any political subdivision thereof”; repealed (a)(iv), which read “‘Substantial completion’ means the date when the construction is sufficiently complete, in accordance with the contract documents, as modified by any change orders agreed to by the parties, so that the work or designated portion thereof is available for use by the owner”; in (a)(v) substituted “completion of any public work” for “completion of the design and construction, major maintenance or renovation of any public building, work, improvement, facility, structure or system”; in (a)(vi), (a)(vii), (a)(ix), and (a)(xi) through (a)(xiii) substituted “public work” for “project”; in (a)(vii) substituted “public work” for “construction project work” twice, and deleted “with a guaranteed maximum price in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00)” after “any project”; in the introductory language of (a)(ix) substituted “public work” for “public project” and “necessary for the public work” for “necessary to construct the project”; in (a)(ix)(A) substituted “public works” for “projects”; and added (a)(xiv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 203, § 1, appropriates one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) from the budget reserve account to the state loan and investment board to be expended as provided in the act.

§ 16-6-702.
Public entity; contracts; partial payments; retainage; alternate delivery methods authorized.

A public entity awarding a contract for a public work shall authorize partial payments of the amount due under the contract as stipulated in the contract document or as soon thereafter as practicable, to the contractor if the contractor is satisfactorily performing the contract.

In all contracts with a public entity for a public work, the public entity may retain no more than five percent (5%) of the calculated value of any work completed as retainage. The retained payment shall be due and payable as prescribed by W.S. 16-6-116(a). The retained payment shall be held in an account in the name of the contractor which account has been assigned to the public entity. If the public entity finds that satisfactory progress is being made in all phases of the contract it may, upon written request by the contractor, authorize payment from the withheld percentage. Before the payment is made, the public entity shall determine that satisfactory and substantial reasons exist for the payment and shall require written approval from any surety furnishing bonds for the contract work.

Alternate design and construction delivery methods may be used by a public entity for a public work.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 158, § 1; 2006, ch. 98, § 2; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (b).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “major maintenance or renovation” for “alteration or repair” in the first sentence and “major maintenance, renovation” for “improvement” in the fourth sentence of (a) and substituted “renovate or perform major maintenance of a” for “alter, repair or maintain” in (b).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) deleted “Notwithstanding W.S. 15-1-113(e)” at the beginning and substituted “contract for a public work” for “contract for the construction, major maintenance or renovation of any highway, public building, public work or public improvement, structure or system”; designated (b) from present (a) beginning with the second sentence and rewrote the present first sentence, which read “No more than ten percent (10%) of the calculated value of any work completed shall be withheld until fifty percent (50%) of the work required by the contract has been performed,” deleted the former second sentence, which read “Thereafter, the public entity may pay any of the remaining installments without retaining additional funds if, in the opinion of the public entity, satisfactory progress is being made in the work but under no condition shall more than ten percent (10%) be withheld on the remaining fifty percent (50%) of the work required,” added the present second sentence, in the present third sentence substituted “The retained payment shall be held” for “The withheld percentage of the contract price of the work, major maintenance, renovation or construction shall be retained,” added “account” after “contractor which,” and deleted “until the contract is completed satisfactorily and finally accepted by the public entity” at the end.

§ 16-6-703.
Public work; completion by public entity; partial payments.

If it becomes necessary for a public entity to take over the completion of any public work, all of the amounts owing the contractor, including any payment retained under W.S. 16-6-702(b), shall first be applied toward the cost of completion of the public work. Any balance of the retained payment remaining after completion of the public work by the public entity shall be payable to the contractor or the contractor’s creditors. The retained payment which may be due any contractor shall be due and payable as prescribed by W.S. 16-6-116(a).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 158, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “public work” for “contract” throughout the section, “any payment retained under W.S. 16-6-702(b)” for “the withheld percentage,” “balance of the retained payment remaining after completion of the public work” for “balance remaining in the retained percentage after completion,” “retained payment” for “retained percentage,” and “W.S.

16-6-116

(a)” for “W.S.

16-6-116

.”

§ 16-6-704.
Interest bearing deposit agreement; option to enter into.

If requested by the general contractor, a public entity shall enter into an interest bearing deposit agreement with any depository designated by the general contractor, after notice to the surety, to provide an agent for the custodial care and servicing of any deposits placed with him pursuant to this act on any contract of more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00). The services shall include the safekeeping of the obligations and the rendering of all services required to effectuate the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 158, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added “If requested by the general contractor” to the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “general contractor” for “contractor,” and “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” for “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00).”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both sentences, see § 16-6-701(a)(viii).

§ 16-6-705.
Custodian for obligations; collection of interest income — payable to contractor.

The public entity or any depository designated by the contractor to serve as custodian for the obligations pursuant to W.S.

16-6-704

shall collect all interest and income when due on obligations so deposited and shall pay them, when and as collected, to the contractor or as otherwise instructed by the contractor. Any expense incurred for this service shall not be charged to the public entity.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 158, § 1.

§ 16-6-706.
Applicability of provisions.

This act does not apply in the case of a contract made or awarded by any public entity if a part of the contract price is to be paid with funds from the federal government or from some other source and if the federal government or the other source has requirements concerning retention or payment of funds which are applicable to the contract and which are inconsistent with this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 158, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 16-6-701(a)(viii).

§ 16-6-707.
Construction management alternate delivery method.

Excluding contracts for professional services, construction management and design-build delivery negotiations by public entities and construction managers shall be in accordance with residency and preference requirements imposed under W.S.

16-6-101

through

16-6-107

.

Formal requests for proposal for preconstruction or construction services by a construction manager or a design-builder submitted by a public entity shall require at least the following information:

The location of the primary place of business;

The name and identification of individuals to be assigned to the project;

Experience with similar projects;

Qualifications;

Ability to protect the interests of the public entity during the project;

Ability to meet project budget and time schedule requirements;

Excluding contracts for professional services, compliance with W.S.

16-6-101

through

16-6-107

; and

For design-build alternative construction delivery methods, the names of the prime consultants used for architectural and engineering design services.

Negotiations between a public entity and a construction manager at-risk shall require that the construction manager at-risk comply with the residency and preference requirements imposed under W.S.

16-6-101

through

16-6-107

in the procurement of subcontractors and materials.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 98, § 1; 2007, ch. 128, § 1; ch. 185, § 1.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, inserted “and design-build” in (a); in (b), inserted “or a design-builder,” and added (b)(viii); and made related and stylistic changes.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 185, § 1, substituted “16-6-101 through

16-6-107

” for “16-6-102” in (b)(vii); and added (c).

Laws 2007, ch. 185, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

While neither of the amendments gave effect to the other, both have been set out as above.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 16-6-708.
Responsibilities under alternative delivery contracts.

Any construction manager agent, construction manager at risk or design-builder contract awarded shall comply with any reporting and administrative requirements as required by the public entity of the recipient of a design, bid and build contract, including retained payments, payment and performance bonding and default of contract.

All bids received under this section including subcontractor bids, shall be opened in public following reasonable public notice.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 98, § 1; 2007, ch. 128, § 1; 2010, ch. 111, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “or design-builder” and made a related change.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (b).

Laws 2010, ch. 111, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2010.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b), substituted “received” for “let.”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “including retained payments” for “including retainage.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.